Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201358-854
Bondholders; pledge; agreement of the state.

The
State of Nebraska does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any
obligations issued under the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance Authority
Act and with those parties who may enter into contracts with the authority
pursuant to the act that the state will not limit or alter the rights vested
in the authority until such obligations, together with the interest thereon,
are fully met and discharged and such contracts are fully performed on the
part of the authority, except that nothing contained in this section shall
preclude such limitation or alteration if and when adequate provision is made
by law for the protection of the holders of such obligations of the authority
or those entering into such contracts with the authority.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 51;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 29;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2951;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 51;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1751;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 54.
September 6, 2013